Massachusetts, session 194th, H5363.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The first paragraph of chapter 86 of the acts of 1975 is hereby amended by
striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- The
commissioner of conservation and recreation may lease, for a period of 30 years with a provision
for renewal periods of an additional 30 year term or less, a parcel of land, hereinafter described,
in East Mountain state forest, for the support of skiing facilities and other seasonal or year-round
natural resource-based outdoor recreational activities, subject to the approval of the
commissioner, provided, however, that said lease shall contain a fair rental fee as determined by
the commissioner.
SECTION 2. All other provisions of chapter 86 of the acts of 1975 shall remain in full
force and effect.
of 1